src/morphology/stemparts/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_ENTÄÄ

0:tä      V_FRONT_AINF   ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:nä      V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_3SG_Ä      ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0:s       V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:s       V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:n       V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:t       V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:tä        V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:tä        V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ne        V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:net       V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:net       V_FRONT_TUPCP_0   ;
0:tä        V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;



LEXICON V_KASVAA


0:a      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:a      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:a      V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:a      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:a      V_BACK_3SG_A      ;
0:a      V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0:o       V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:o       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:a        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:a        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e        V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:et       V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:et       V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;
0:a        V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_VIRKKAA

0:ka      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:ka      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:a      V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ka      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ka      V_BACK_3SG_A      ;
0:ka      V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0:o       V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:ko       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ka        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ka        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e        V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:et       V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:et       V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;
0:ka        V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_TAPPAA

0:pa      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:pa      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:a      V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:pa      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pa      V_BACK_3SG_A      ;
0:pa      V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0:o       V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:po       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:pa        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:pa        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e        V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:et       V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:et       V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;
0:pa        V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_AUTTAA

0:ta      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:ta      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:a      V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ta      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ta      V_BACK_3SG_A      ;
0:ta      V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0:o       V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:to       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ta        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ta        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e        V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:et       V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:et       V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;
0:ta        V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_SATAA

0:ta      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:ta      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:da     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ta      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ta      V_BACK_3SG_A      ;
0:ta      V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0:do      V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:to       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ta        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ta        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:de       V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:det      V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:det      V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;
0:ta        V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_KANTAA

0:ta      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:ta      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:na     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ta      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ta      V_BACK_3SG_A      ;
0:ta      V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0:no      V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:to       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ta        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ta        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ne       V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:net      V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:net      V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;
0:ta        V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;



LEXICON V_KAATAA


0:ta      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:ta      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:da     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ta      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ta      V_BACK_3SG_A      ;
0:ta      V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0:do      V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:s      V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:to       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:s       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ta        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ta        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:de       V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:det      V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:det      V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;
0:ta        V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_SAARTAA

0:ta      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:ta      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:ra     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ta      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ta      V_BACK_3SG_A      ;
0:ta      V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0:ro      V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:s      V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:to       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:s       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ta        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ta        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:re       V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ret      V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:ret      V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;
0:ta        V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;



LEXICON V_KYTKEÄ


0:e      V_FRONT_AINF   ;
0:i      V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:e      V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:e      V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:e      V_FRONT_3SG_E ;
0      V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0       V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0       V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:e        V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:e        V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e        V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:et       V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:et       V_FRONT_TUPCP_0   ;
0:e        V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_SOTKEA

0:e      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:i      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:e      V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:e      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:e      V_BACK_3SG_E ;
0       V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0       V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:e        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:e        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e        V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:et       V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:et       V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;
0:e        V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_PUKEA

0:ke      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:ki      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:e      V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ke      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ke      V_BACK_3SG_E ;
0:k     V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0       V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:k       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ke        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ke        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e        V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:et       V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:et       V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;
0:ke        V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_RYPEÄ

0:pe      V_FRONT_AINF   ;
0:pi      V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:ve      V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:pe      V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pe      V_FRONT_3SG_E ;
0:p       V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0:v       V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:p       V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:pe        V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:pe        V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ve        V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:vet       V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:vet       V_FRONT_TUPCP_0   ;
0:pe        V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_PÄTEÄ

0:te      V_FRONT_AINF   ;
0:ti      V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:de      V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:te      V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:te      V_FRONT_3SG_E ;
0:t       V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0:d       V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:t       V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:te        V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:te        V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:de        V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:det       V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:det       V_FRONT_TUPCP_0   ;
0:te        V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_KUTEA

0:te      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:ti      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:de      V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:te      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:te      V_BACK_3SG_E ;
0:t       V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0:d       V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:t       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ; 
0:te        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:te        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:de        V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:det       V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:det       V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;
0:te        V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_TUNKEA

0:ke      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:ki      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:ge      V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ke      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ke      V_BACK_3SG_E ;
0:k       V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0:g       V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:k       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ; 
0:ke        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ke        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ge        V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:get       V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:get       V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;
0:ke        V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_POLKEA

0:ke      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:ki      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:je      V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ke      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ke      V_BACK_3SG_E ;
0:k       V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0:j       V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:k       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ; 
0:ke        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ke        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:je        V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:jet       V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:jet       V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;
0:ke        V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_SÄRKEÄ

0:ke      V_FRONT_AINF   ;
0:ki      V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:je      V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ke      V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ke      V_FRONT_3SG_E ;
0:k       V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0:j       V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:k       V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ke        V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ke        V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:je        V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:jet       V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:jet       V_FRONT_TUPCP_0   ;
0:ke        V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;



LEXICON V_TUNTEA


0:te      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:ti      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:ne      V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:te      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:te      V_BACK_3SG_E ;
0:t       V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0:s       V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:s       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ; 
0:te        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:te        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ne        V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:net       V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:net       V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;
0:te        V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;



LEXICON V_LÄHTEÄ


0:hte      V_FRONT_AINF   ;
0:hti      V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:hde      V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:hte      V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:hte      V_FRONT_3SG_E ;
0:ht       V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0:hd       V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:ht       V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ks       V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:ks       V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:hte        V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:hte        V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:hde        V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:hdet       V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:hdet       V_FRONT_TUPCP_0   ;
0:hte        V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;



LEXICON V_KOSIA


0:i      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:i      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:i      V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:i      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:i      V_BACK_3SG_I ;
0        V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0       V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:i        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:i        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:i        V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:it       V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:it       V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;
0:i        V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_RYSKIÄ

0:i      V_FRONT_AINF   ;
0:i      V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:i      V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:i      V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:i      V_FRONT_3SG_I ;
0       V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0       V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0       V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:i        V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:i        V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:i        V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:it       V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:it       V_FRONT_TUPCP_0   ;
0:i        V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_KUKKIA

0:ki      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:ki      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:i      V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ki      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ki      V_BACK_3SG_I ;
0:k     V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0       V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:k       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ki        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ki        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:i        V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:it       V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:it       V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;
0:ki       V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_SÖRKKIÄ

0:ki      V_FRONT_AINF   ;
0:ki      V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:i      V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ki      V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ki      V_FRONT_3SG_I ;
0:k       V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0       V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:k       V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ki        V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ki        V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:i        V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:it       V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:it       V_FRONT_TUPCP_0   ;
0:ki        V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_KALPPIA

0:pi      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:pi      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:i      V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:pi      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pi      V_BACK_3SG_I ;
0:p       V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0       V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:p       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:pi        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:pi        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:i        V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:it       V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:it       V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;
0:pi        V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;
